Illinois, session 104th, HB3441.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-14-1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-14-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-1)7    Sec. 3-14-1. Release from the institution. 8    (a) Upon release of a person on parole, mandatory release, 9final discharge, or pardon, the Department shall return all 10property held for him, provide him with suitable clothing and 11procure necessary transportation for him to his designated 12place of residence and employment. It may provide such person 13with a grant of money for travel and expenses which may be paid 14in installments. The amount of the money grant shall be 15determined by the Department.16    (a-1) The Department shall, before a wrongfully imprisoned 17person, as defined in Section 3-1-2 of this Code, is 18discharged from the Department, provide him or her with any 19documents necessary after discharge. 20    (a-2) The Department of Corrections may establish and 21maintain, in any institution it administers, revolving funds 22to be known as "Travel and Allowances Revolving Funds". These 23revolving funds shall be used for advancing travel and expense   HB3441 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11014 RLC 21096 b1allowances to committed, paroled, and discharged prisoners. 2The moneys paid into such revolving funds shall be from 3appropriations to the Department for Committed, Paroled, and 4Discharged Prisoners.5    (a-3) Upon release of a person who is eligible to vote on 6parole, mandatory release, final discharge, or pardon, the 7Department shall provide the person with a form that informs 8him or her that his or her voting rights have been restored and 9a voter registration application. The Department shall have 10available voter registration applications in the languages 11provided by the Illinois State Board of Elections. The form 12that informs the person that his or her rights have been 13restored shall include the following information:14        (1) All voting rights are restored upon release from 15    the Department's custody.16        (2) A person who is eligible to vote must register in 17    order to be able to vote. 18    The Department of Corrections shall confirm that the 19person received the voter registration application and has 20been informed that his or her voting rights have been 21restored. 22    (a-4) Prior to release of a person on parole, mandatory 23supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the Department 24shall screen every person for Medicaid eligibility. Officials 25of the correctional institution or facility where the 26committed person is assigned shall assist an eligible person   HB3441 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11014 RLC 21096 b1to complete a Medicaid application to ensure that the person 2begins receiving benefits as soon as possible after his or her 3release. The application must include the eligible person's 4address associated with his or her residence upon release from 5the facility. If the residence is temporary, the eligible 6person must notify the Department of Human Services of his or 7her change in address upon transition to permanent housing. 8    (b) (Blank).9    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, the 10Department shall establish procedures to provide written 11notification of any release of any person who has been 12convicted of a felony to the State's Attorney and sheriff of 13the county from which the offender was committed, and the 14State's Attorney and sheriff of the county into which the 15offender is to be paroled or released. Except as otherwise 16provided in this Code, the Department shall establish 17procedures to provide written notification to the proper law 18enforcement agency for any municipality of any release of any 19person who has been convicted of a felony if the arrest of the 20offender or the commission of the offense took place in the 21municipality, if the offender is to be paroled or released 22into the municipality, or if the offender resided in the 23municipality at the time of the commission of the offense. If a 24person convicted of a felony who is in the custody of the 25Department of Corrections or on parole or mandatory supervised 26release informs the Department that he or she has resided,   HB3441 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 11014 RLC 21096 b1resides, or will reside at an address that is a housing 2facility owned, managed, operated, or leased by a public 3housing agency, the Department must send written notification 4of that information to the public housing agency that owns, 5manages, operates, or leases the housing facility. The written 6notification shall, when possible, be given at least 14 days 7before release of the person from custody, or as soon 8thereafter as possible. The written notification shall be 9provided electronically if the State's Attorney, sheriff, 10proper law enforcement agency, or public housing agency has 11provided the Department with an accurate and up to date email 12address. 13    (c-1) (Blank).14    (c-2) The Department shall establish procedures to provide 15notice to the Illinois State Police of the release or 16discharge of persons convicted of violations of the 17Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act or a 18violation of the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act. The 19Illinois State Police shall make this information available to 20local, State, or federal law enforcement agencies upon 21request.22    (c-5) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 23release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 24by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 25Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 26Department of Corrections shall provide copies of the   HB3441 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 11014 RLC 21096 b1following information to the appropriate licensing or 2regulating Department and the licensed or regulated facility 3where the person becomes a resident:4        (1) The mittimus and any pre-sentence investigation 5    reports.6        (2) The social evaluation prepared pursuant to Section 7    3-8-2.8        (3) Any pre-release evaluation conducted pursuant to 9    subsection (j) of Section 3-6-2.10        (4) Reports of disciplinary infractions and 11    dispositions.12        (5) Any parole plan, including orders issued by the 13    Prisoner Review Board, and any violation reports and 14    dispositions.15        (6) The name and contact information for the assigned 16    parole agent and parole supervisor. 17    This information shall be provided within 3 days of the 18person becoming a resident of the facility. 19    (c-10) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 20release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 21by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 22Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 23Department of Corrections shall provide written notification 24of such residence to the following:25        (1) The Prisoner Review Board.26        (2) The chief of police and sheriff in the   HB3441 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 11014 RLC 21096 b1    municipality and county in which the licensed facility is 2    located.3    The notification shall be provided within 3 days of the 4person becoming a resident of the facility. 5    (d) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 6mandatory supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the 7Department shall provide such person with information 8concerning programs and services of the Illinois Department of 9Public Health to ascertain whether such person has been 10exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or any 11identified causative agent of Acquired Immunodeficiency 12Syndrome (AIDS).13    (e) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 14mandatory supervised release, final discharge, pardon, or who 15has been wrongfully imprisoned, the Department shall verify 16the released person's full name, date of birth, and social 17security number. If verification is made by the Department by 18obtaining a certified copy of the released person's birth 19certificate and the released person's social security card or 20other documents authorized by the Secretary, the Department 21shall provide the birth certificate and social security card 22or other documents authorized by the Secretary to the released 23person. If verification by the Department is done by means 24other than obtaining a certified copy of the released person's 25birth certificate and the released person's social security 26card or other documents authorized by the Secretary, the   HB3441 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 11014 RLC 21096 b1Department shall complete a verification form, prescribed by 2the Secretary of State, and shall provide that verification 3form to the released person.4    (f) Forty-five days prior to the scheduled discharge of a 5person committed to the custody of the Department of 6Corrections, the Department shall give the person:7        (1) who is otherwise uninsured an opportunity to apply 8    for health care coverage including medical assistance 9    under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code in 10    accordance with subsection (b) of Section 1-8.5 of the 11    Illinois Public Aid Code, and the Department of 12    Corrections shall provide assistance with completion of 13    the application for health care coverage including medical 14    assistance;15        (2) information about obtaining a standard Illinois 16    Identification Card or a limited-term Illinois 17    Identification Card under Section 4 of the Illinois 18    Identification Card Act if the person has not been issued 19    an Illinois Identification Card under subsection (a-20) of 20    Section 4 of the Illinois Identification Card Act;21        (3) information about voter registration and may 22    distribute information prepared by the State Board of 23    Elections. The Department of Corrections may enter into an 24    interagency contract with the State Board of Elections to 25    participate in the automatic voter registration program 26    and be a designated automatic voter registration agency   HB3441 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 11014 RLC 21096 b1    under Section 1A-16.2 of the Election Code;2        (4) information about job listings upon discharge from 3    the correctional institution or facility;4        (5) information about available housing upon discharge 5    from the correctional institution or facility;6        (6) a directory of elected State officials and of 7    officials elected in the county and municipality, if any, 8    in which the committed person intends to reside upon 9    discharge from the correctional institution or facility; 10    and11        (7) any other information that the Department of 12    Corrections deems necessary to provide the committed 13    person in order for the committed person to reenter the 14    community and avoid recidivism. 15    (g) Sixty days before the scheduled discharge of a person 16committed to the custody of the Department or upon receipt of 17the person's certified birth certificate and social security 18card as set forth in subsection (d) of Section 3-8-1 of this 19Act, whichever occurs later, the Department shall transmit an 20application for an Identification Card to the Secretary of 21State, in accordance with subsection (a-20) of Section 4 of 22the Illinois Identification Card Act.23    (h) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 24mandatory supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the 25Department of Corrections shall provide the person with 26resources to acclimate the person to life outside the   HB3441 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 11014 RLC 21096 b1correctional institution or facility, including access to 2social workers, clinical psychologists, and other counselors. 3The counselors shall assist the person in obtaining housing, 4employment, education, health care, State identification, and 5other resources that the counselors deem necessary to assist 6in the person's adjustment to society and the prevention of 7recidivism. The Department of Human Services shall provide 8assistance to the person to achieve the goals of this 9subsection without interference from the person's assigned 10parole officer. 11    The Department may adopt rules to implement this Section. 12(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 13102-606, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-345, eff. 141-1-24.)